Washington statutes.
RCW 9.35.030

Soliciting undesired mail.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly use a means of identification or financial information of another person to solicit undesired mail with the intent to annoy, harass, intimidate, torment, or embarrass that person.

(2) Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(3) Additionally, a person who violates this section is liable for civil damages of five hundred dollars or actual damages, including costs to repair the person's credit record, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court.

[ 2001 c 217 s 10; 2000 c 77 s 1.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2001 c 217: See note following RCW 9.35.005.